Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-191
Credential; disciplinary action; hearing; failure to appear; effect.

If a credential holder fails to appear, either in person or by counsel, at the time and place designated in the notice required by section 38-189, the director, after receiving satisfactory evidence of the truth of the charges, shall order the credential revoked or suspended or shall take any or all of the other appropriate disciplinary measures authorized by section 38-196 against the credential.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 55, p. 468;

C.S.1929, § 71-610;

R.S.1943, § 71-156;

Laws 1976, LB 877, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 54;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 46;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 34;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 385;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-156;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 309;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 91.